Mississippi statutes. Title 5. Legislative Department
Chapter 1. Legislature

§ 5-1-1.
Apportionment of representatives.

The number of Representatives shall be one hundred twenty-two (122) and shall be elected from districts adopted as provided in Section 254 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5329; 1942, §§ 3326, 3326.1; Laws, 1940, ch. 275; Laws, 1954, ch. 317; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 91; Laws, 1956, ch. 408; Laws, 1960, ch. 403; Laws, 1962, ch. 577; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess. ch. 34, §§ 3-7; Laws, 1964, ch. 483; Laws, 1966 Ex Sess. ch. 41, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch 394 § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 25, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 515, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 568, § 1, eff from and after July 29, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 5-1-2.
Nomination and election of representatives by posts in districts having more than one representative.

To minimize confusion in the electoral process, in all districts for the election of more than one (1) representative, each representative shall be nominated and elected by posts in order that the voter may have a clear-cut choice for each seat to be chosen from a specific group of candidates (Chapman v. Meier, Supreme Court decision).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 510, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1975).

§ 5-1-3.
Apportionment of senators.

The number of Senators shall be fifty-two (52) and shall be elected from fifty-two (52) districts adopted as provided in Section 254 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5330; 1942 §§ 3327, 3327.1; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess. ch. 34, § 1; Laws, 1966 Ex Sess, ch. 41, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 394 § 2; Laws, 1973, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 457, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 484, § 1; Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 535, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 568 , § 2, eff from and after July 29, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 5-1-4.
Nomination and election of senators by posts in districts where more than one senator is to be elected.

To minimize confusion in the electoral process, in all districts for the election of more than one (1) senator, each senator shall be nominated and elected by posts in order that the voter may have a clear-cut choice for each seat to be chosen from a specific group of candidates (Chapman v. Meier, Supreme Court decision).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 484, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 5-1-5.
Qualified person may be candidate for state senator; election conducted on senatorial district basis; names on ballots.

Any qualified elector of any senatorial district, as defined in Section 5-1-3, who possesses the necessary constitutional qualifications may qualify as a candidate and be elected a state senator without regard to any so-called gentleman’s agreement or any other restriction. All elections for the office of state senator shall be conducted on a senatorial district basis regardless of the number of counties composing said district, and the names of qualified candidates therefor shall be placed on the ballots in each precinct of every county within said senatorial district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3327.5; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess. ch. 34, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 2, 1963).

§ 5-1-7.
Holding of meetings.

The legislature shall meet at the seat of government, in regular session, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of January, in the year A.D. 1971, and every year thereafter, unless sooner convened by the governor; and should a quorum of either house not be present, each house shall be adjourned from day to day, after taking the necessary steps to compel the attendance of absent members until a quorum appears.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2648; 1906, § 3008; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5396; 1930, § 5331; 1942, § 3328; Laws, 1912, ch. 231; Laws, 1970, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 18, 1970).

§ 5-1-9.
Organization of the house of representatives.

At the hour of twelve o’clock, noon, on the day appointed for the meeting of any regular session of the legislature the secretary of state shall take the chair in the hall of the house of representatives, and call over the roll of counties in alphabetical order, and of the representative districts composed of more or less than one county. Upon the call of such roll the members-elect therefrom shall present their certificates of election, which shall be prima facie evidence of the right to membership. After the call of the roll and the presentation of said certificates, each member so present shall then take the oath of office prescribed by section forty of the constitution, which oath may be administered by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall cause to be kept, by the clerk of the last house or other suitable person, a record of the proceedings of organization, which shall form a part of the journal of the house. At any other than a regular session, a new member, on presentation of his certificate of election, shall be sworn as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2649; 1906, § 3009; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5397; 1930, § 5332; 1942, § 3329.

§ 5-1-11.
Election of officers of house of representatives.

Having selected some member for the chair pro tempore, the house of representatives shall then choose, by a viva voce vote of a majority of the members present, the votes being entered on the journal, a speaker, and a clerk.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 5, art. 3; 1871, § 330; 1880, § 173; 1892, § 2650; 1906, § 3010; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5398; 1930, § 5333; 1942, § 3330; Laws, 1964, ch. 484; Laws, 1971, ch. 416, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1971).

§ 5-1-13.
Organization of the senate.

At the hour of twelve o’clock, noon, on the day appointed for the meeting of any regular session of the legislature, the lieutenant-governor shall take the chair in the senate chamber and call the list of senatorial districts in their numerical order. Upon the call of districts the senators-elect therefrom shall present their certificates of election, which shall be prima facie evidence of the right of membership. After the call of districts and the presentation of the certificates, each senator then present shall take the oath of office prescribed by section forty of the constitution, which oath may be administered by the lieutenant-governor. The lieutenant-governor shall cause to be kept, by the secretary of the last senate or other proper person, a record of the proceedings of organization, which shall form a part of the journal of the senate. At any session where the senate has been previously organized, any new senator, on presenting his certificate of election, shall be sworn as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2651; 1906, § 3011; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5399; 1930, § 5334; 1942, § 3331.

§ 5-1-15.
Election of officers of the senate.

The senate shall proceed, by viva voce vote of a majority of the senators present, to elect a secretary, a sergeant-at-arms and a doorkeeper. The votes shall be entered on the journal. In like manner the senate shall proceed to choose a president of the senate pro tempore, who shall preside in the absence of the lieutenant governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 5, art. 3; 1871, § 329; 1880, § 175; 1892, § 2652; 1906, § 3012; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5400; 1930, § 5335; 1942, § 3332. 1983, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 9, 1983).

§ 5-1-17.
Organization in absence of the proper officer.

Should the secretary of state or lieutenant-governor from any cause fail to appear at the time fixed for organizing the respective houses, it shall be the duty of a judge of the Supreme Court, or, in case of emergency, then of any officer qualified to administer oaths, to perform the duties in and about the organizations of said houses prescribed to be performed by the secretary of state and lieutenant-governor respectively; but if the senate be organized by any other officer than the lieutenant-governor, some senator shall be selected to preside pro tempore before entering upon the election of officers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2653; 1906, § 3013; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5401; 1930, § 5336; 1942, § 3333.

§ 5-1-19.
Officers of the legislature and committee chairmen authorized to administer oaths.

The lieutenant-governor, the president pro tempore of the senate, the secretary of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the clerk thereof, may administer oaths to the officers of their respective houses, and each shall take the oath of office prescribed by section two hundred and sixty-eight of the constitution. Each of said officers may administer oaths to witnesses before their respective houses, or any committee thereof, and the chairman of the committee of the whole, or of any standing, select, or special committee, or subcommittee of either house, or of any joint committee or subjoint committee, may administer oaths to witnesses before it in any case under examination.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2654; 1906, § 3014; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5402; 1930, § 5337; 1942, § 3334.

§ 5-1-21.
Subpoena for witnesses.

A subpoena requiring the attendance of any witness before either house of the legislature, or a committee thereof, may be issued by the presiding officer or the chairman of any committee before which the attendance of the witness is desired. Such subpoena may be served by any person who might be a witness in the matter of its service, and his affidavit that he delivered a copy to the witness shall be evidence of service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2655; 1906, § 3015; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5403; 1930, § 5338; 1942, § 3335.

§ 5-1-23.
Proceedings against recalcitrant witnesses.

If any witness neglects or refuses to obey a subpoena, or, appearing, refuses to testify, the senate or house may, by a resolution entered on its journal, commit him for contempt, the commitment not to extend beyond the final adjournment of the session; and any witness neglecting and refusing to attend in obedience to a subpoena may be arrested by the sergeant-at-arms and brought before the senate or house; and a copy of the resolution of the senate or house, signed by the presiding officer thereof, and attested by the secretary or clerk, shall be sufficient authority to authorize such arrest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2656; 1906, § 3016; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5404; 1930, § 5339; 1942, § 3336.

§ 5-1-25.
Witnesses not liable to prosecution in certain cases.

A person sworn and examined as a witness before either house, without procurement or contrivance, on his part, shall not be held to answer criminally, or be subject to any penalty or forfeiture for any fact or act touching which he is required to testify; nor shall any statement made, or book, document, or paper produced by any such witness be competent evidence in any criminal proceeding against such witness other than for perjury in delivering his evidence; nor shall such witness refuse to testify to any fact or to produce any book, document, or paper touching which he is examined, on the ground that he thereby will criminate himself, or that it will tend to disgrace him or render him infamous.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2657; 1906, § 3017; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5405; 1930, § 5340; 1942, § 3337.

§ 5-1-27.
Perjury.

Every witness shall be liable to prosecution and punishment for perjury committed by him in any examination. Moreover, if the perjury be manifest, such witness shall be guilty thereby of contempt of the senate or house, as the case may be, and shall be punished accordingly.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2658; 1906, § 3018; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5406; 1930, § 5341; 1942, § 3338.

§ 5-1-29.
Additional duties of legislators.

In addition to the duties now required by law, each legislator shall attend at least two (2) meetings of the board of supervisors of the county he or she represents, and, in the case of floater representatives and senators who represent more than one (1) county, each shall attend at least one (1) meeting of the board of supervisors in each of the counties in his or her flotorial or senatorial district, as the case may be, during each biennium of his or her term of office. Each legislator shall attend at least two (2) meetings of the city or town board of aldermen or city council, as the case may be, of the city or town in which he or she resides, and if he or she resides in no city or town, the city or town where the county site of government is located, during each biennium of his or her term of office, such visits to be for the purpose of informing said legislators of the county and city and/or town affairs. The legislators shall visit the universities and state senior colleges and also each of the eleemosynary and penal institutions of the state. The legislators shall study the educational programs of the common schools, colleges and public schools and visit in the public schools of his or her county or district. The legislators shall also attend meetings called by the governor for the purpose of discussing affairs of the state, and it shall be the duty of such legislators to attend meetings of any standing committees, of which he or she is a member, between sessions of the legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5348; 1942, § 3345; Laws, 1928, ch. 297; Laws, 1932, ch. 260; Laws, 1933, ch. 151; Laws, 1946, ch. 198; Laws, 1950, ch. 456; Laws, 1956 ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 521, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 327; Laws, 1966, ch. 436, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 356, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1972).

§ 5-1-31.
Duties of secretary and clerk.

The secretary of the senate and clerk of the house of representatives shall keep a correct journal of the proceedings of their respective houses, and, on each day, shall read over the journal of the preceding day to their respective houses. They shall number, file and preserve in its proper order, each bill, resolution, memorial or other paper introduced in their respective houses, and carefully engross and enroll all bills, resolutions, memorials and other papers that may be ordered to be engrossed or enrolled. They shall promptly and faithfully discharge all the duties incident to their respective offices.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 5, art. 4; 1871, § 334; 1880, § 177; 1892, § 2659; 1906, § 3019; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5407; 1930, § 5342; 1942, § 3339; Laws, 1931, ch. 7; Laws, 1983, ch. 329, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 9, 1983).

§ 5-1-33.
Provision of manuscripts and indexes of House and Senate journals.

The Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives shall prepare and furnish to the Secretary of State a true copy of the manuscripts of the journals of their respective houses together with complete indexes to the journals. The Secretary of State shall transmit the manuscripts of the journals and the indexes to the person or firm contracted with to print the same for publication. The Secretary of State is designated as the contracting officer for the purposes of this section, and he shall require the person or firm so contracted with to give bond with sufficient sureties or security in such penalties and with such conditions as he shall require.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 5, art. 6; 1871, § 336; 1880, § 178; 1892, §§ 2660, 2661; 1906, §§ 3020, 3021; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5408, 5409; 1930, §§ 5343, 5344; 1942, §§ 3340, 3341; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 5-1-35.
Duty of the sergeant-at-arms.

The sergeant-at-arms of the senate shall give a general supervision, under the direction of the presiding officer. He shall attend the sittings thereof, preserve order, execute its commands and all process issued by its authority, and shall have control of the doorkeeper. He shall see that the hall of the senate and the committee rooms and the room of its presiding officer, the anterooms, lobbies and galleries thereof, are clean, comfortable and lighted at night during the sitting of the senate, and that all necessary conveniences are supplied to the members, officers and committees.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2662; 1906, § 3022; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5410; 1930, § 5345; 1942, § 3342; Laws, 1971, ch. 416, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 329, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 9, 1983).

§ 5-1-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 329, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 9, 1983).

§5-1-37. [Codes, 1892, § 2663; 1906, § 3023; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5411; 1930, § 5346; 1942, § 3343]

§ 5-1-39.
Dismissal of officers and servants.

Each house shall have power at any time to dismiss any or all of its officers and servants elected or appointed by it, and to elect or appoint others in their places.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2664; 1906, § 3024; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5412; 1930, § 5347; 1942, § 3344.

§ 5-1-41.
Remuneration of legislators.

Beginning with the 1986 Regular Session of the Legislature of the State of Mississippi, each Senator and Representative of the Legislature shall receive as compensation at each regular session the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) and the mileage allowance provided by Section 25-3-41, for each mile of the distance by the most direct route usually traveled in coming to and returning from the place where the Legislature sits. Beginning on April 16, 1997, each Senator and Representative shall receive for attending each extraordinary session or called session the sum of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) per day and mileage at the same rate as per regular session. In addition to the above, beginning on April 16, 1997, each Senator and Representative and the Lieutenant Governor shall receive the sum of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per month for expenses incidental to his office for every full month of his term, except any month or major fraction there of when the Legislature is convened in regular or extraordinary session; and payments shall be made to each Senator and Representative and the Lieutenant Governor by the State Treasurer between the first and tenth day of each month following the month for which the payments are due.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5348; 1942, § 3345; Laws, 1928, ch. 297; Laws, 1932, ch. 260; Laws, 1933, ch. 151; Laws, 1946, ch. 198; Laws, 1950, ch. 456; Laws, 1956, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 521, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 327; Laws, 1966, ch. 436, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 356, § 1, 1974, ch. 531, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 409, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 490; Laws, 1997, ch. 577, § 6; Laws, 1999, ch. 581, § 5, eff from and after June 17, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 5-1-43.
Remuneration of lieutenant governor and speaker of the house.

The salary of the Lieutenant Governor and of the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) annually, and they shall receive for attending each extraordinary or called session the same compensation and mileage as is provided for members of the Legislature. However, in the event the Lieutenant Governor serving on the effective date of Laws, 1997, chapter 577, shall be re-elected for the term beginning in the year 2000, he shall continue to receive an annual salary of Forty Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($40,800.00).

On the first day of each month, the Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall receive in twelve (12) equal monthly installments the compensation provided for pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5349; 1942, § 3346; Laws, 1928, ch. 297; Laws, 1946, ch. 198; Laws, 1950, ch. 456; Laws, 1956, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 328; Laws, 1966, ch. 436, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 531, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 301; Laws, 1988, ch. 579, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 577, § 7, eff from and after January 1, 1998.

§ 5-1-45.
Remuneration of the president pro tempore of the senate.

Beginning on June 4, 1997, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall receive an annual salary in an amount equal to Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00). The salary provided for the President Pro Tempore under this section shall be in addition to the compensation and expense allowance established for members of the Legislature under Section 5-1-41.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880 § 185; 1892, § 2669; 1906, § 3029; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5417; 1930, § 5350; 1942, § 3348; Laws, 1912, ch. 231; Laws, 1946, ch. 198; Laws, 1950, ch. 456; Laws, 1956, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 577, § 8, eff from and after June 4, 1997 (the date the Unites States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).

§ 5-1-46.
Remuneration of the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives.

Beginning on June 4, 1997, the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives shall receive an annual salary in an amount equal to Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00). The salary provided for the Speaker Pro Tempore under this section shall be in addition to the compensation and expense allowance established for members of the Legislature under Section 5-1-41.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 577, § 9, eff from and after June 4, 1997 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the enactment of this section).

§ 5-1-47.
Additional mileage and expense allowances of lieutenant governor, senators, and representatives.

In addition to the regular salary and mileage provided by law, an expense allowance equal to the maximum daily expense rate allowable to employees of the federal government for travel in the high rate geographical area of Jackson, Mississippi, as may be established by federal regulations for each legislative day in actual attendance at a session shall be paid to the Lieutenant Governor and members of the Senate and House of Representatives, together with an additional mileage allowance as provided by Section 25-3-41, for each mile of the distance by the most direct route usually traveled in coming to and returning from the place where the Legislature is in session, which expense allowance and additional mileage allowance shall be paid at the end of each seven-day period while the Legislature is in session.

In addition to the mileage allowance provided for in subsection (1) of this section, an expense allowance equal to the maximum daily expense rate allowable to employees of the federal government for travel in the high rate geographical area of Jackson, Mississippi, as may be established by federal regulations, per day, shall be paid to:

The Lieutenant Governor and members of the Senate, upon the approval of the Senate Rules Committee, for attending to legislative duties on any of the following days that the Senate does not convene in session on that day: (i) any day between legislative regular or extraordinary sessions, or (ii) any day of a legislative regular session that has been extended beyond the number of calendar days specified in Section 36, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, when that day falls after the ninetieth or one-hundred-twenty-fifth day of the session, as the case may be, or (iii) any day during a legislative extraordinary session; and

Members of the House of Representatives, upon the approval of the House Management Committee, for attending to legislative duties on any of the following days that the House does not convene in session on that day: (i) any day between legislative regular or extraordinary sessions, or (ii) any day of a legislative regular session that has been extended beyond the number of calendar days specified in Section 36, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, when that day falls after the ninetieth or one-hundred-twenty-fifth day of the session, as the case may be, or (iii) any day during a legislative extraordinary session.

The expense allowance and additional mileage allowance provided by this section for the Lieutenant Governor and members of the Senate shall be paid from the appropriate legislative fund of the Senate as provided by law, and the expense allowance and additional mileage allowance for members of the House of Representatives shall be paid from the appropriate legislative fund of the House of Representatives as provided by law, upon warrants drawn for such purpose in the manner provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3346.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 449; Laws, 1952, ch. 326, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 326, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 437, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 356, § 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 302; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 409, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 539; Laws, 1988, ch. 314, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 483, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2009).

§ 5-1-49.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 329, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 9, 1983).

§5-1-49. [Codes, 1942, § 3347; Laws, 1932, ch. 325]

§ 5-1-51.
When compensation is due.

The mileage and one-third (1/3) of the salary for a regular session shall be paid at the beginning of the session. After thirty (30) days of the session have expired, another one-third (1/3) of the salary shall be paid. The remaining one-third (1/3) of the salary shall be paid (a) on the last Friday before the ninetieth day of a ninety-day session, or (b) on the earlier of the last day the Legislature is convened or the last Friday before the one-hundred-twenty-fifth day of a one-hundred-twenty-five-day session, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 183; 1892, § 2667; 1906, § 3027; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5415; 1930, § 5351; 1942, § 3349; Laws, 1912, ch. 231; Laws, 1938, ch. 169; Laws, 1946, ch. 379; Laws, 1954, ch. 325; Laws, 1956, ch. 357, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 483, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2009).

§ 5-1-53.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 329, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 9, 1983).

§5-1-53. [Codes, 1880, § 187; 1892, § 2670; 1906, § 3030; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5418; 1930, § 5352; 1942, § 3350; Laws, 1931, ch. 8]

§ 5-1-55.
How compensation is obtained.

The compensation of the members, officers, and servants of the legislature shall be certified by the president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives, respectively, to the auditor of public accounts, who shall issue his warrant on the treasurer therefor, payable out of the legislative appropriation.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 17, art. 7 (4); 1857, ch. 5, art. 12; 1871, § 333; 1880, § 189; 1892, § 2671; 1906, § 3031; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5419; 1930, § 5353; 1942, § 3351.

§ 5-1-57.
Legislative Extraordinary Session Expense Revolving Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Legislative Extraordinary Session Expense Revolving Fund. This fund is established for the purpose of paying the salaries, mileage, daily expense allowance, retirement contributions, matching funds and any other expenses of the members of the Legislature that are incurred during any extraordinary session of the Legislature. All income from the investment of funds in the revolving fund shall be credited to the special fund, and any funds remaining in the revolving fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund.

The State Bond Commission shall grant noninterest bearing loans to the Legislative Extraordinary Session Expense Revolving Fund from the State Treasurer’s General Fund/Special Fund Pool, upon the joint request of the Clerk of the House and the Secretary of the Senate, which loans shall be used to pay any expenses of the members of the Legislature that are incurred during any extraordinary session of the Legislature. The total amount of loans granted to the revolving fund during any fiscal year may not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00).

The Legislature shall repay the amount of any loan granted to the revolving fund within eighteen (18) months after the end of the extraordinary session for which the loan was requested. The repayment shall be made to the State Treasurer’s General Fund/Special Fund Pool. The Legislature may request the amount of the repayment in its annual budget request to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 439, § 1 eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 5-1-59.
Renumeration of witnesses for state.

Witnesses on behalf of the state subpoenaed to appear before the legislature, or either branch thereof, or any committee authorized to send for witnesses, shall be allowed the same compensation for each day’s attendance, and the same mileage allowed to witnesses in the circuit courts. The sum due to each witness shall be ascertained by his own affidavit before the secretary of the senate or clerk of the house of representatives or chairman of the committee before whom he was subpoenaed to appear, who shall give the witness a certificate thereof attaching the affidavit to the same. On production of such certificate the auditor shall issue his warrant on the treasurer therefor, payable out of the legislative appropriation.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 17, art. 8 (1); 1857, ch. 5, art. 13; 1871, § 338; 1880, § 190; 1892, § 2672; 1906, § 3032; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5420; 1930, § 5354; 1942, § 3352.

§ 5-1-61.
Joint convention; place and time of assemblage.

When by the constitution or laws a joint meeting of the senate and house of representatives is required, they shall assemble with their secretary and clerk in the hall of the house of representatives on the day and hour previously agreed on by a concurrent resolution or as fixed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2674; 1906, § 3034; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5422; 1930, § 5356; 1942, § 3354.

§ 5-1-63.
Joint convention; limitation on powers.

The joint convention, when assembled, shall not have power to perform any act other than that specified in the concurrent resolution calling the same or required by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2675; 1906, § 3035; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5423; 1930, § 5357; 1942, § 3355.

§ 5-1-65.
Joint convention; presiding officers and records.

When the two houses shall be assembled in joint convention the president of the senate shall preside, and the secretary of the senate and the clerk of the house of representatives shall each keep a perfect and complete record of the proceedings of the convention. On the re-assembling of the two houses in their respective halls, it shall be the duty of the secretary and clerk to report the same to their respective houses, and the same shall be entered at large upon their journals.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2676; 1906, § 3036; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5424; 1930, § 5358; 1942, § 3356.

§ 5-1-67.
Joint convention; rules.

The rules of the house of representatives and the joint rules of the two houses, as far as the same may be applicable, shall be the rules for the government of the joint convention.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2677; 1906, § 3037; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5425; 1930, § 5359; 1942, § 3357.

§ 5-1-69.
Joint convention; votes and elections.

All votes in the joint convention shall be taken by yeas and nays, and all elections shall be viva voce. In taking the same it shall be the duty of the secretary of the senate to call the names of the members of the senate, after which the clerk of the house of representatives shall in like manner call the names of the members of the house. Each member of the senate and house of representatives present shall be required to vote on all questions and in all elections in joint convention, unless excused by a vote of the convention.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2678; 1906, § 3038; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5426; 1930, § 5360; 1942, § 3358.

§ 5-1-71.
Joint convention; majority to elect.

The person who receives a majority of all the votes of the joint convention, a majority of all the members elected to both houses being present and voting, shall be duly elected. When more than one officer is to be elected the vote shall be so taken as to elect only one at a time.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2679; 1906, § 3039; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5427; 1930, § 5361; 1942, § 3359.

§ 5-1-73.
Joint convention; punishment of members.

Any member of either house who may be guilty of disorderly behavior in the presence of the joint convention, may be punished by the house of which he is a member in the same manner as if the offense were committed in the presence of his house.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2680; 1906, § 3040; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5428; 1930, § 5362; 1942, § 3360.

§ 5-1-75.
Joint convention; punishment of persons not members.

The joint convention shall have power to punish any person other than a member for disorderly or contemptuous behavior in its presence, by fine and imprisonment, in the same manner and to the same extent as either house may do for like conduct before it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2681; 1906, § 3041; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5429; 1930, § 5363; 1942, § 3361.

§ 5-1-77.
Mail carrier and distributor for legislature.

There shall be a mail carrier and distributor for the legislature of the state, who shall be elected at the same time and by the same method as now provided for the election of state librarian, and whose term of office shall be for a period of four years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5364; 1942, § 3362; Laws, 1922, ch. 292.

§ 5-1-79.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 329, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 9, 1983).

§5-1-79. [Codes, 1930, § 5365; 1942, § 3363; Laws, 1922, ch. 292]

§ 5-1-81.
Location of post office.

The post office or place for distributing the mails and the depository for receiving the outgoing mails, shall be located on the second floor of the capitol, in the room to the left of the entrance, which was provided for such purpose in the plan of the state capitol building.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5366; 1942, § 3364; Laws, 1922, ch. 292.

§ 5-1-83.
Capitol Commission to fit up post office.

The capitol commission as keeper of the capitol, is hereby authorized and directed to make such alterations and provide such furnishings for the post-office room as in its judgment may seem proper, to fit it for the convenience and necessary requirements of sections 5-1-79 and 5-1-81.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5367; 1942, § 3365; Laws, 1922, ch. 292.

§ 5-1-85.
Publication of fiscal note for certain bills or concurrent resolutions.

For any bill or concurrent resolution, the purpose or effect of which is to expend state funds or enable the spending of state funds, or to increase or decrease the revenue of the state, either directly or indirectly, that passes out of a committee for which a fiscal note was drafted, the fiscal note shall be published in electronic form on the Mississippi Legislature website on the web page that provides the bill text, description, background information, history of actions, amendments, and additional information for the bill within twenty-four (24) hours of passing out of committee.If a fiscal note was not drafted for any such bill or concurrent resolution, the statement “No fiscal note conducted” shall be included on the web page.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 324, § 1, effective July 1, 2012.